Hawaii statutes.
§576B-504 Immunity from civil liability.
An employer that complies with an income withholding order issued in another
state in accordance with this article is not subject to civil liability to an
individual or agency with regard to the employer's withholding of child support
from the obligor's income. [L 1997, c 295, pt of §1; am L 2015, c 77, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next